North Carolina, session 2025, SB1082.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.1. Article I of the North Carolina Constitution is amended by adding a
new section to read:
"Sec. 39. Right to work.
The right to live includes the right to work. The exercise of the right to work must be protected
and maintained free from undue restraints and coercion. It is the public policy of the State that
the right of persons to work shall not be denied or abridged on account of membership or
nonmembership in any labor union or labor organization or association. The General Assembly
may prescribe general laws to further define and implement this section."
SECTION 1.2. The amendment set out in Section 1.1 of this act shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3,
2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that
time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to protect the right of North Carolinians to be employed
without being forced to join and pay membership dues to a labor union or association."
SECTION 1.3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under Section 1.2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question
are in favor of the amendment set out in Section 1.1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll
the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are against the amendment set out in Section 1.1 of this act, the amendment shall have
no effect.
SECTION 1.4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section
1.3 of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment
set out in Section 1.1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1.1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*S1082-v-1*